Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 6 Campaign Practices
7-6-215. Registration and reporting by approved political action committees.

(a)(1)(A)

To qualify as an approved political action committee, the political action committee shall register with the Secretary of State within fifteen (15) days after accepting contributions during a calendar year that exceed five hundred dollars ($500) in the aggregate.

(B)

Registration shall be annually renewed by January 15, unless the political action committee has ceased to exist.

(C)

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(1)(D) of this section, registration shall be on forms provided by the Secretary of State, and the contents therein shall be verified by an affidavit of an officer of the political action committee.

(D)(i)

Registration with the Secretary of State under this section may be filed in electronic form through the official website of the Secretary of State if electronic filing is offered by the Secretary of State.

(ii)

An electronic registration shall be verified by an officer of the political action committee.

(iii)

(a)

The Arkansas Ethics Commission shall approve a format used by the Secretary of State for registering as a political action committee in electronic form under subdivision (a)(1)(D)(i) of this section to ensure that all required information is requested.

(b)

A format used by the Secretary of State for registering as a political action committee in electronic form shall provide that a registration filed in electronic form be rejected if it omits the name, street address, or telephone number of an individual designated as the resident agent for the political action committee.

(iv)

The official website of the Secretary of State shall allow for searches of political action committee registration information filed in electronic form under subdivision (a)(1)(D)(i) of this section.

(E)

Registration with the Secretary of State under this section may be filed in paper form if:

(i)

The political action committee does not have access to the technology necessary to submit registration in electronic form;

(ii)

Submitting registration in electronic form would constitute a substantial hardship for the political action committee; and

(iii)

The political action committee submits a notarized affidavit that complies with §7-6-231.

(2)(A)

The political action committee shall maintain for a period of four (4) years records evidencing the name, address, and place of employment of each person that contributed to the political action committee, along with the amount contributed.

(B)

Furthermore, the political action committee shall maintain for a period of four (4) years records evidencing the name and address of each candidate, ballot question committee, legislative question committee, political party, county political party committee, or other political action committee that received a contribution from the political action committee, along with the amount contributed.

(3)(A)

The political action committee shall designate a resident agent who shall be an individual who resides in this state.

(B)

No contribution shall be accepted from a political action committee and no expenditure shall be made by a political action committee that has not registered and does not have a resident agent.

(C)

It shall be unlawful for a prohibited political action committee as defined in §7-6-201 to make a contribution to a:

(i)

Ballot question committee;

(ii)

Legislative question committee;

(iii)

Political party;

(iv)

Political party committee; or

(v)

Political action committee.

(4)(A)

An out-of-state political action committee, including a federal political action committee, shall be required to comply with the registration and reporting provisions of this section if the committee contributes more than five hundred dollars ($500) in a calendar year to candidates, ballot question committees, legislative question committees, political parties, county political party committees, or other political action committees within this state.

(B)

Subdivision (a)(4)(A) of this section shall not apply to:

(i)

The national committee of any political party that is registered with the Federal Election Commission;

(ii)

Any federal candidate committee that is registered with the Federal Election Commission;

(iii)

Funds which a subordinate committee of the national committee of any political party that is registered with the Federal Election Commission transfers to the federal account of an organized political party as defined under §7-1-101; or

(iv)

Funds which a political action committee that is registered with the Federal Election Commission transfers to the federal account of an organized political party as defined under §7-1-101.

(b)

The registration form of an approved political action committee shall contain the following information:

(1)

The name, address, and, where available, phone number of the political action committee and the name, address, phone number, and place of employment of each of its officers, provided if the political action committee's name is an acronym, then both it and the words forming the acronym shall be disclosed;

(2)

The professional, business, trade, labor, or other interests represented by the political action committee, including any individual business, organization, association, corporation, labor organization, or other group or firm whose interests will be represented by the political action committee;

(3)

The full name and street address, city, state, and zip code of each financial institution the political action committee uses for purposes of receiving contributions or making expenditures within this state;

(4)

The name, street address, and telephone number of the individual designated as the resident agent for the political action committee;

(5)

If the registration form is filed in paper form, a written acceptance of designation as a resident agent;

(6)

A certification by a political action committee officer, under penalty of false swearing, that the information provided on the registration is true and correct; and

(7)

A clause submitting the political action committee to the jurisdiction of the State of Arkansas for all purposes related to compliance with the provisions of this subchapter.

(c)(1)

When a committee makes a change to any information required in subsection (b) of this section, an amendment shall be filed within ten (10) days to reflect the change.

(2)

A committee failing to file an amendment shall be subject to a late filing fee of ten dollars ($10.00) for each day the change is not filed.

(d)(1)

Within fifteen (15) calendar days after the end of each calendar quarter, a political action committee shall file a quarterly report with the Secretary of State, including the following information:

(A)

The total amount of contributions received and the total amount of contributions made during the filing period and the cumulative amount of those totals;

(B)

The current balance of political action committee funds;

(C)

The name and address of each person that made a contribution or contributions to the political action committee that exceeded five hundred dollars ($500) in the aggregate during the calendar year, the contributor's place of business, employer, occupation, the date of the contribution, the amount contributed, and the total contributed for the year;

(D)

The name and address of each candidate, ballot question committee, legislative question committee, political party, county political party committee, or other political action committee, if any, to whom or which the political action committee made a contribution or contributions that exceeded fifty dollars ($50.00) in the aggregate during the filing period, with the amount contributed and the election for which the contribution was made;

(E)

The name and address of each candidate, ballot question committee, legislative question committee, political party, county political party committee, or other political action committee, if any, to whom or which the political action committee contributed a nonmonetary item, together with a description of the item, the date the item was contributed, and the value of the item; and

(F)

The total amount of expenditures made for administrative expenses and for each single expenditure that exceeded one hundred dollars ($100), an itemization, including the amount of the expenditure, the name and address of the person to whom the expenditure was made, and the date the expenditure was made.

(2)

Political action committee quarterly reports may be filed in electronic form through the official website of the Secretary of State if electronic filing is offered by the Secretary of State.

(3)

The information required in subdivisions (d)(1)(C)-(F) of this section may be provided in the form of schedules attached to a report filed in paper form.

(4)

The reports shall be verified by an affidavit of an officer of the political action committee stating that to the best of his or her knowledge and belief the information so disclosed is a complete, true, and accurate financial statement of the political action committee's contributions received and made.

(5)(A)

A report is timely filed if it is filed in electronic form through the official website of the Secretary of State on or before the date that the report is due if the Secretary of State offers electronic filing of political action committee reports.

(B)(i)

The Secretary of State shall receive reports in a readable electronic format that is acceptable to the Secretary of State and approved by the Arkansas Ethics Commission.

(ii)

The Arkansas Ethics Commission shall approve the format used by the Secretary of State for the filing of political action committee reports in electronic form to ensure that all required information is requested.

(iii)

The official website of the Secretary of State shall allow for searches of political action committee report information filed in electronic form.

(iv)

A political action committee under this section may file reports in paper form under this section if:

(a)

The political action committee does not have access to the technology necessary to submit reports in electronic form;

(b)

Submitting reports in electronic form would constitute a substantial hardship for the political action committee; and

(c)

The political action committee submits a notarized affidavit that complies with §7-6-231.

(6)(A)

A political action committee shall indicate on its quarterly report for the fourth quarter of each calendar year whether or not it intends to renew its registration for the next calendar year.

(B)(i)

If a quarterly report for the fourth quarter is filed in paper form, the form utilized by the Secretary of State for filing shall require the political action committee to indicate whether or not it intends to renew its registration for the next calendar year.

(ii)

A political action committee indicating that it will renew its registration for the next calendar year shall submit its registration form for the next calendar year at the same time as the quarterly report for the fourth quarter.

(iii)

The Secretary of State shall not accept a quarterly report for the fourth quarter if:

(a)

The political action committee indicates that it intends to renew its registration for the next calendar year; and

(b)

The registration form for the next calendar year is not submitted at the same time as the quarterly report for the fourth quarter.

(C)

If the Secretary of State offers electronic filing of political action committee reports, the format used by the Secretary of State for the filing of political action committee reports in electronic form shall require a political action committee indicating that it intends to renew its registration for the next calendar year to renew its registration for the next calendar year before submitting its quarterly report for the fourth quarter.

History.

Init. Meas. 1990, No. 1, § 6; Init. Meas. 1996, No. 1, § 7; Acts 1999, No. 553, §§ 15-17; 2001, No. 1839, § 7; 2005, No. 2006, § 2; 2007, No. 221, § 8; 2009, No. 473, § 5; 2011, No. 721, § 9; 2015, No. 909, § 1; 2017, No. 616, § 2; 2019, No. 1039, §§ 2, 3.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment substituted “designate a resident agent who shall be an individual who resides in” for “appoint a treasurer who is a qualified elector of” in (a)(3)(A); inserted the (a)(4)(A) designation and inserted (a)(4)(B); in (a)(4)(A), inserted “including a federal committee,” deleted “including the appointment of a treasurer who is a qualified elector of this state and the establishment of an account in a depository within this state” following “this section,” inserted “independent expenditure committees” and “within this state”; in the introductory paragraph of (b), deleted “approved political action committee shall disclose on the” preceding “registration” and inserted “of an approved political action committee shall contain”; rewrote (b)(4); substituted “designation as a resident agent” for “appointment by the treasures” in (b)(5); added (b)(6) and (b)(7); added (c) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; inserted present (d)(1)(E) and redesignated former (d)(1)(E) as present (d)(1)(F); deleted former (d)(1)(F); and added (d)(2) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment inserted (a)(3)(C); and substituted “resident agent” for “treasurer” in (a)(3)(B).

The 2011 amendment inserted “ballot question committee, legislative question committee, political party, county political party committee, or other political action committee” in (a)(1)(B); deleted “independent expenditure committees” following “party committees” in (a)(4)(A); inserted “during the calendar year” in (d)(1)(C); and, in (d)(1)(D) and (E), inserted “ballot question committee, legislative question committee, political party, county political party committee” and “other.”

The 2015 amendment added “Except as provided in subdivision (a)(1)(D) of this section” in (a)(1)(C); added (a)(1)(D); inserted (b)(4) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions of (b) accordingly; added “If the registration form is filed in paper form” in present (b)(5); inserted (d)(2) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions of (d) accordingly; substituted “a report filed in paper form” for “the report” at the end of (d)(3); rewrote (d)(5)(A); inserted “filed in paper form” in (d)(5)(B); and added (d)(5)(D) and (d)(6).

The 2017 amendment rewrote (d)(5).

The 2019 amendment added (a)(1)(E) and (d)(5)(B)(iv)

(c)

7-6-216. Registration and reports by exploratory committees.

(a)(1)

An exploratory committee shall register with the appropriate filing office within fifteen (15) days after receiving contributions during a calendar year which, in the aggregate, exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

(2)(A)

For a state or district office, the place of filing shall be the Secretary of State's office.

(B)

For a county, municipal, township, or school district office, the place of filing shall be the county clerk's office.

(3)

Registration shall be on forms provided by the Secretary of State and the contents therein shall be verified by an affidavit of an officer of the committee.

(b)

An exploratory committee shall disclose on the registration form the name, address, and, where available, phone number of the committee and each of its officers. It shall also disclose the individual person who, upon becoming a candidate, is intended to receive campaign contributions from the committee.

(c)

Within thirty (30) days of the end of each month, an exploratory committee shall file a report with the appropriate filing office indicating:

(1)

The total amount of contributions received during the filing period;

(2)

The name and address of each person who has made a contribution which, in the aggregate, exceeds fifty dollars ($50.00), along with the contributor's principal place of business, employer, occupation, and the amount contributed; and

(3)

The total amount of expenditures made and, for each single expenditure that exceeds one hundred dollars ($100), an itemization, including the amount of the expenditure, the name and address of the person to whom the expenditure was made, and the date the expenditure was made.

(d)(1)(A)

The first report shall be filed for the month in which the committee files its registration. The final report shall be filed within thirty (30) days after the end of the month in which the committee either transfers its contributions to a candidate's campaign or no longer accepts contributions.

(B)

The reports required by this section shall be filed in electronic form through the official website of the Secretary of State.

(C)

The Arkansas Ethics Commission shall approve the format used by the Secretary of State for the filing of exploratory reports in electronic form to ensure that all required information is requested.

(D)

The official website of the Secretary of State shall allow for searches of exploratory committee report information filed in electronic form.

(2)

An exploratory committee under this section may file reports in paper form under this section if:

(A)

The exploratory committee does not have access to the technology necessary to submit reports in electronic form; and

(B)

Submitting reports in electronic form would constitute a substantial hardship for the exploratory committee.

(3)

The committee shall not accept contributions after the filing of a final report.

History.

Init. Meas. 1990, No. 1, § 6; Acts 1999, No. 553, § 18; 2001, No. 1839, § 8; 2007, No. 221, § 9; 2009, No. 473, § 6; 2011, No. 721, § 10; 2013, No. 1126, § 12; 2017, No. 616, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment added the (d)(1) designation and added (d)(2).

The 2009 amendment inserted (a)(2) and redesignated the remaining text accordingly.

The 2011 amendment substituted “appropriate filing office” for “Secretary of State” in (a)(1) and (c).

The 2013 amendment substituted “that” for “which” in (c)(3).

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (d)(1) as present (d)(1)(A); added (d)(1)(B) through (d)(1)(D); inserted present (d)(2); and redesignated former (d)(2) as present (d)(3).

7-6-217. Creation of Arkansas Ethics Commission.

(a)(1)

The Arkansas Ethics Commission shall be composed of five (5) members, one (1) each appointed by the Governor, Attorney General, Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the House of Representatives, and President Pro Tempore of the Senate.

(2)

Members of the commission shall be appointed for terms of five (5) years and shall continue to serve until their successors have been appointed and have taken the official oath.

(3)(A)

No person may be appointed to serve consecutive terms on the commission.

(B)

Provided, any commissioner who has been appointed to serve two (2) years or less of an unexpired term shall be eligible for an appointment to a subsequent five-year term.

(4)

In the event of a vacancy on the commission, a successor shall be appointed within thirty (30) days to serve the remainder of the unexpired term, such appointment to be made by the official holding the office responsible for appointing the predecessor.

(b)(1)

In making appointments to the commission, the appointing officials shall ensure that at least one (1) member of a minority race, one (1) woman, and one (1) member of the minority political party, as defined in §7-1-101, serves on the commission.

(2)

Any person appointed as a member of the minority political party must have voted in the preferential primaries of the minority political party in the last two (2) primaries in which he or she has voted.

(c)(1)

No member of the commission shall be a federal, state, or local government official or employee, an elected public official, a candidate for public office, a lobbyist as defined in §21-8-402, or an officer or paid employee of an organized political party as defined in §7-1-101.

(2)

During the entire term of service on the commission, a commissioner shall be prohibited from raising funds for, making contributions to, providing services to, or lending his or her name in support of any candidate for election to a state, county, municipal, or school board office under the laws of Arkansas or in support of a ballot issue or issues submitted or intended to be submitted to the voters of the State of Arkansas, or any of its political subdivisions, excluding the exercise of the right to vote or the mere signing of an initiative or referendum petition. Employees of the commission shall be similarly prohibited.

(d)(1)

The commission shall elect its chair.

(2)(A)

A majority of the membership of the commission shall constitute a quorum for conducting business.

(B)

No action shall be taken except by an affirmative vote of a majority of those present and voting.

(C)

No sanctions shall be imposed without the affirmative vote of at least three (3) members of the commission who are physically present at a commission meeting.

(3)

The vote of each member voting on any action shall be a public record.

(e)

Members of the commission shall serve without compensation but may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with §25-16-901 et seq.

(f)

The commission shall meet at such times as may be provided by its rules, upon call of the chair, or upon written request to the chair of any three (3) members.

(g)

The commission shall have the authority to:

(1)

Under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq., promulgate reasonable rules to implement and administer the requirements of this subchapter, as well as the Disclosure Act for Public Initiatives, Referenda, and Measures Referred to Voters, §7-9-401 et seq.; §19-11-718; §21-8-301 et seq.; the Disclosure Act for Lobbyists and State and Local Officials, §21-8-401 et seq., §21-8-601 et seq., §21-8-701 et seq., and §21-8-801 et seq.; §21-8-901; §21-8-1001 et seq.; and Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, §§ 28-30; and to govern procedures before the commission, matters of commission operations, and all investigative and disciplinary procedures and proceedings;

(2)

Issue advisory opinions and guidelines on the requirements of §7-1-103(a)(1)-(4), (6), and (7); this subchapter; the Disclosure Act for Public Initiatives, Referenda, and Measures Referred to Voters, §7-9-401 et seq.; §19-11-718; §21-8-301 et seq.; the Disclosure Act for Lobbyists and State and Local Officials, §21-8-401 et seq., §21-8-601 et seq., §21-8-701 et seq., and §21-8-801 et seq.; §21-8-901 et seq.; §21-8-1001 et seq.; and Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, §§ 28-30;

(3)

After a citizen complaint has been submitted to the commission, investigate alleged violations of §7-1-103(a)(1)-(4), (6), and (7); this subchapter; the Disclosure Act for Public Initiatives, Referenda, and Measures Referred to Voters, §7-9-401 et seq.; §19-11-718; §21-1-401 et seq.; §21-8-301 et seq.; the Disclosure Act for Lobbyists and State and Local Officials, §21-8-401 et seq., §21-8-601 et seq., §21-8-701 et seq., and §21-8-801 et seq.; §21-8-901; §21-8-1001 et seq.; and Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, §§ 28-30; and render findings and disciplinary action thereon;

(4)

Pursuant to commission investigations, subpoena any person or the books, records, or other documents being held by any person and take sworn statements;

(5)

Administer oaths for the purpose of taking sworn testimony of witnesses and conduct hearings;

(6)

Hire a staff and retain legal counsel;

(7)

Approve forms prepared by the Secretary of State under this subchapter; the Disclosure Act for Public Initiatives, Referenda, and Measures Referred to Voters, §7-9-401 et seq.; §19-11-718; §21-8-301 et seq.; the Disclosure Act for Lobbyists and State and Local Officials, §21-8-401 et seq., §21-8-601 et seq., §21-8-701 et seq., and §21-8-801 et seq.; §21-8-901 et seq.; and §21-8-1001 et seq.; and

(8)(A)

File suit in the Pulaski County Circuit Court or in the circuit court of the county wherein the respondent resides or, under §16-17-706, in the small claims division established in any district court in the State of Arkansas, to obtain a judgment for the amount of any fine imposed under §7-6-218(b)(4)(B)(i)-(iii), or to enforce an order of the commission requiring the filing or amendment of a disclosure form.

(B)

Said action by the court shall not involve further judicial review of the commission's actions.

(C)

The fee normally charged for the filing of a suit in any of the circuit courts in the State of Arkansas shall be waived on behalf of the commission.

(h)

When in the course of an investigation the commission issues subpoenas to financial institutions for records or information regarding a person who is the subject of the investigation, the commission shall provide the subject of the investigation with reasonable notice of the subpoenas and an opportunity to respond.

History.

Init. Meas. 1990, No. 1, § 6; Acts 1995, No. 349, § 1; 1995, No. 352, § 1; 1997, No. 250, § 43; 1999, No. 553, §§ 19-21; 2001, No. 1839, §§ 9, 10; 2003, No. 195, § 6; 2003, No. 1185, § 6; 2005, No. 1284, § 5; 2015, No. 47, § 1; 2015, No. 1280, §
8; 2015, No. 1287, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted by Init. Meas. 1990, No. 1, § 6, subsection (a) of this section began “Effective January 2, 1991.”

Init. Meas. 1990, No. 1, § 6, provided, in part, that the initial commission shall be appointed no later than January 2, 1991.

As amended by identical Acts 1995, Nos. 349 and 352, subdivision (a)(3)(B) ended:

“Those commissioners currently serving shall complete their current term.”

Publisher's Notes.

Init. Meas. 1990, No. 1, § 6, provided, in part, that members of the commission shall serve for a term of five (5) years, except that the initial members shall draw lots at their first meeting to determine their terms of service, with one member serving one (1) year, one member serving two (2) years, one member serving three (3) years, one member serving four (4) years, and one member serving five (5) years.

Acts 2015, No. 1280, § 8 specifically amended this section as amended by Acts 2015, No. 47.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment by No. 47 added “and Sections 28, 29, and 30 of Article 19 of the Arkansas Constitution” to the end of (g)(2).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1280 inserted “and Sections 28, 29, and 30 of Article 19 of the Arkansas Constitution” in (g)(1) and (g)(3).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1287, in (g), substituted “under” for “pursuant to”, inserted “§19-11-718”, and deleted “§21-8-501 et seq. [repealed]” preceding “§21-8-601” throughout; and deleted “and regulations” following “reasonable rules” in (g)(1).

7-6-218. Citizen complaints — Definition.

(a)(1)

Any citizen may file a complaint with the Arkansas Ethics Commission against a person covered by this subchapter, by §7-1-103(a)(1)-(4), (6), or (7); the Disclosure Act for Public Initiatives, Referenda, and Measures Referred to Voters, §7-9-401 et seq.; §21-1-401 et seq.; §21-8-301 et seq.; the Disclosure Act for Lobbyists and State and Local Officials, §21-8-401 et seq., §21-8-601 et seq., §21-8-701 et seq., and §21-8-801 et seq.; §21-8-901 et seq.; §21-8-1001 et seq.; and Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, §§ 28-30, for an alleged violation of the subchapters or sections. For purposes of this subdivision (a)(1), the Arkansas Ethics Commission shall be considered a citizen.

(2)

A complaint must be filed within four (4) years after the alleged violation occurred. If the alleged violation is the failure to file a report or the filing of an incorrect report, the complaint shall be filed within four (4) years after the date the report was due.

(b)(1)(A)

Upon a complaint stating facts constituting an alleged violation signed under penalty of perjury by any person, the Arkansas Ethics Commission shall investigate the alleged violation of this subchapter or §7-1-103(a)(1)-(4), (6), or (7); the Disclosure Act for Public Initiatives, Referenda, and Measures Referred to Voters, §7-9-401 et seq.; §21-1-401 et seq.; §21-8-301 et seq.; the Disclosure Act for Lobbyists and State and Local Officials, §21-8-401 et seq., §21-8-601 et seq., §21-8-701 et seq., and §21-8-801 et seq.; §21-8-901 et seq.; §21-8-1001 et seq.; and Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, §§ 28-30.

(B)

The Arkansas Ethics Commission shall immediately notify any person under investigation of the investigation and of the nature of the alleged violation.

(C)

The Arkansas Ethics Commission in a document shall advise the complainant and the respondent of the final action taken, together with the reasons for the action, and such document shall be a public record.

(D)

Filing of a frivolous complaint shall be a violation of this subchapter. For purposes of this section, “frivolous” means clearly lacking any basis in fact or law. In any case in which the Arkansas Ethics Commission has dismissed a complaint, the respondent may request in writing that the Arkansas Ethics Commission make a finding as to whether or not the complaint filed was frivolous. In the event that the Arkansas Ethics Commission finds that the complaint was frivolous, the respondent may file a complaint seeking sanctions as provided in subdivision (b)(4) of this section.

(2)

If, after the investigation, the Arkansas Ethics Commission finds that probable cause exists for a finding of a violation, the respondent may request a hearing. The hearing shall be a public hearing.

(3)(A)

The Arkansas Ethics Commission shall keep a record of its investigations, inquiries, and proceedings.

(B)(i)

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(3)(B)(ii) of this section, all proceedings, records, and transcripts of any investigations or inquiries shall be kept confidential by the Arkansas Ethics Commission, unless the respondent requests disclosure of documents relating to investigation of the case, in case of a hearing under subdivision (b)(2) of this section, or in case of judicial review of a decision of the Arkansas Ethics Commission pursuant to §25-15-212.

(ii)

(a)

Through its members or staff, the Arkansas Ethics Commission may disclose confidential information to proper law enforcement officials, agencies, and bodies, or as may be required to conduct its investigation.

(b)

If an investigation or inquiry concerns an attorney or judge, the Arkansas Ethics Commission may, through its members or staff, disclose confidential information to the Supreme Court Committee on Professional Conduct or the Judicial Discipline and Disability Commission.

(C)

Thirty (30) days after any final adjudication in which the Arkansas Ethics Commission makes a finding of a violation, all records relevant to the investigation and upon which the Arkansas Ethics Commission has based its decision, except working papers of the Arkansas Ethics Commission and its staff, shall be open to public inspection.

(4)

If the Arkansas Ethics Commission finds a violation of this subchapter; §7-1-103(a)(1)-(4), (6), or (7); §21-1-401 et seq.; §21-8-301 et seq.; the Disclosure Act for Lobbyists and State and Local Officials, §21-8-401 et seq., §21-8-601 et seq., §21-8-701 et seq., and §21-8-801 et seq.; §21-8-901 et seq.; §21-8-1001 et seq.; or Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, §§ 28-30, then the Arkansas Ethics Commission shall do one (1) or more of the following, unless good cause be shown for the violation:

(A)

Issue a public letter of caution or warning or reprimand;

(B)(i)

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§7-6-202,7-9-409,21-8-403, and21-8-903, impose a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) for negligent or intentional violation of this subchapter; the Disclosure Act for Public Initiatives, Referenda, and Measures Referred to Voters, §7-9-401 et seq.; §21-8-301 et seq.; the Disclosure Act for Lobbyists and State and Local Officials, §21-8-401 et seq., §21-8-601 et seq., §21-8-701 et seq., and §21-8-801 et seq.; §21-8-901 et seq.; §21-8-1001 et seq.; or Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, §§ 28-30.

(ii)

The Arkansas Ethics Commission shall adopt rules governing the imposition of such fines in accordance with the provisions of the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq.

(iii)

All moneys received by the Arkansas Ethics Commission in payment of fines shall be deposited into the State Treasury as general revenues;

(C)

Order the respondent to file or amend a statutorily required disclosure form; or

(D)(i)

Report its finding, along with such information and documents as it deems appropriate, and make recommendations to the proper law enforcement authorities.

(ii)

When exercising the authority provided in this subdivision (b)(4), the Arkansas Ethics Commission is not required to make a finding of a violation of the laws under its jurisdiction.

(5)(A)(i)

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(5)(A)(iii) of this section, the Arkansas Ethics Commission shall complete its investigation of a complaint filed pursuant to this section and take final action within two hundred ten (210) days of the filing of the complaint.

(ii)

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(5)(A)(iii) of this section, if a hearing under subdivision (b)(2) of this section or other hearing of adjudication is conducted, all action on the complaint by the Arkansas Ethics Commission shall be completed within two hundred forty (240) days.

(iii)

If the Arkansas Ethics Commission requires additional time to complete its investigation under subdivision (b)(5)(A)(i) of this section or to complete its hearing or action under subdivision (b)(5)(A)(ii) of this section and gives written notice to the person who is under investigation or the subject of the hearing or action, the Arkansas Ethics Commission may extend the time to complete the investigation, hearing, or action by no more than sixty (60) days.

(B)

However, such time shall be tolled during the pendency of any civil action, civil appeal, or other judicial proceeding involving those particular Arkansas Ethics Commission proceedings.

(c)

Any final action of the Arkansas Ethics Commission under this section shall constitute an adjudication for purposes of judicial review under §25-15-212.

History.

Init. Meas. 1990, No. 1, § 6; Acts 1995, No. 349, § 2; 1995, No. 352, § 2; 1999, No. 553, § 22; 2001, No. 1839, §§ 11-13; 2003, No. 195, § 7; 2007, No. 221, § 10; 2013, No. 1115, § 1; 2015, No. 1280, § 9; 2017, No. 256, § 1; 2019, No. 341, § 1; 2019, No. 547, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As originally enacted by Init. Meas. 1990, No. 1, § 6 subsection (a) began “Effective July 1, 1991.”

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “Except as provided in subdivision (b)(3)(B)(ii) of this section, all” for “All” in (b)(3)(B)(i); redesignated former (b)(3)(B)(ii) as present (b)(3)(B)(ii)

(a)

; substituted “Through” for “However, through” in present (b)(3)(B)(ii)

(a)

; and added (b)(3)(B)(ii)

(b)

The 2015 amendment inserted references to “Sections 28, 29, and 30 of Article 19 of the Arkansas Constitution” in (a)(1), (b)(1)(A), and twice in (b)(4); added “or sections” in the first sentence of (a)(1); and, in (b)(5)(A), substituted “two hundred ten (210) days” for “one hundred fifty (150) days” in the first sentence, and substituted “two hundred forty (240) days” for “one hundred eighty (180) days” in the second sentence.

The 2017 amendment substituted “the Arkansas Ethics Commission” for “the commission” throughout and deleted references to “§21-8-501 et seq. [repealed]” in (a)(1), (b)(1)(A), and (b)(4); substituted “shall” for “must” in (a)(2); substituted “subdivision (b)(4) of this section” for “§7-6-218(b)(4)” in (b)(1)(D); substituted “a decision of the Arkansas Ethics Commission” for “a commission decision” in (b)(3)(B)(i); and corrected the sequence of statutory references in (a)(1) and (b)(4)(B)(i).

The 2019 amendment by No. 341 substituted “three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500)” for “two thousand dollars ($2,000)” in (b)(4)(B)(i).

The 2019 amendment by No. 547 added “Except as provided in subdivision (b)(5)(A)(iii) of this section” in (b)(5)(A)(i) and (b)(5)(A)(ii); and added (b)(5)(A)(iii).

7-6-219. Retiring a campaign debt.

(a)(1)

Any person who was a candidate and has a campaign debt from an election that has ended may solicit funds and hold fundraisers to retire the campaign debt.

(2)

The contributions received shall be treated as campaign contributions to the person's previous campaign, and all campaign contribution limits shall continue to apply.

(b)

Contributors shall be given notice that the campaign contributions are for the purpose of retiring a campaign debt. Any invitation to or notice of a fundraiser to retire a campaign debt of a previous campaign shall state that the funds are to retire a campaign debt.

(c)

A person shall file a campaign contribution and expenditure report concerning a campaign debt if, since the last report concerning the debt, the person has received cumulative contributions in excess of five hundred dollars ($500). The report shall be filed not later than fifteen (15) days after a calendar quarter in which a report becomes required. No report is required in any calendar quarter in which the cumulative contribution or cumulative expenditure limit has not been exceeded since the person's last report.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1209, § 1; 1997, No. 139, § 1.